New York, session 2025-2026, S8005.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Short title. This act shall be known and may be cited as 2 the "fire safety retrofit act of 2025". 3 § 2. The executive law is amended by adding a new section 382-c to 4 read as follows: 5 § 382-c. Mandatory sprinkler retrofitting for certain existing build- 6 ings. 1. For the purposes of this section, the following terms shall 7 have the following meanings: 8 a. "Large building" means any structure, including structures that are 9 used by school districts, in a city having a population of one million 10 or more which meets any one or more of the following criteria: 11 (i) is greater than seventy-five feet in height from the lowest point 12 of fire department access to the highest occupied floor; 13 (ii) contains a floor area exceeding five thousand square feet, 14 regardless of height, and has an existing standpipe system. 15 b. "Sprinkler system" means a system of piping and appliances designed 16 and installed in accordance with generally accepted standards so that 17 heat from a fire will automatically cause water to be discharged over 18 the fire area to extinguish it or prevent its further spread. 19 2. a. All existing large buildings in a city having a population of 20 one million or more which do not have a sprinkler system that meets or 21 exceeds the standards established in the New York state uniform fire 22 prevention and building code shall be retrofitted with a sprinkler 23 system which is compliant with the standards established in such code, 24 or any rule or regulation established thereto. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13113-01-5 S. 8005 2 1 b. A compliance plan detailing the scope and timeline of any sprinkler 2 system required to be installed pursuant to paragraph a of this subdivi- 3 sion shall be submitted to the local code enforcement agency within two 4 years of the effective date of this section and full installation of 5 such sprinkler systems shall be completed within five years of the 6 effective date of this section. Extensions may be granted for up to two 7 additional years upon demonstration of hardship, as determined by the 8 code enforcement authority. 9 3. Any owner who fails to comply with the provisions of this section 10 shall be subject to a civil penalty not to exceed one thousand dollars 11 per day of noncompliance after the final compliance deadline established 12 pursuant to subdivision two of this section. 13 4. This section shall not apply to landmarks or historical buildings. 14 § 3. This act shall take effect on the one hundred eightieth day after 15 it shall have become a law.